Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS
26-1-122. County appropriations and expenditures - advancements - procedures.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section and section 26-1-122.5, the board of county commissioners in each county of this state shall annually appropriate as provided by law such funds as shall be necessary to defray the county department's twenty percent share of the overall cost of providing the assistance payments, food stamps (except the value of food stamp coupons), and social services activities delivered in the county, including the costs allocated to the administration of each, and shall include in the tax levy for such county the sums appropriated for that purpose. Such appropriation shall be based upon the county social services budget prepared by the county department pursuant to section 26-1-124, after taking into account state advancements provided for in this section.

In the case of a district department, each county forming a part of said district shall appropriate the funds necessary to defray its proportionate share of the costs of assistance payments, food stamps (except the value of food stamp coupons), and social services activities of such individual county based on the ratio set out in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

Additional funds shall be made available by the board of county commissioners if the county funds so appropriated prove insufficient to defray the county department's twenty percent share of actual costs for assistance payments, food stamps (except the value of food stamp coupons), and social services activities, including the administrative costs of each.

Under no circumstances shall any county expend county funds in an amount to exceed its twenty percent share of actual costs for assistance payments, food stamps (except the value of food stamp coupons), and social services activities, including the administrative costs of each, except as provided in paragraph (i) of subsection (4) of this section.

The county boards, in accordance with the rules of the state department, shall file requests with the state department for advancement of funds for the program costs of assistance payments, food stamps (except the value of food stamp coupons), and social services and for the administrative costs of each. The state department shall determine the requirements of each county for program costs, taking into consideration available funds and all pertinent facts and circumstances, and administrative costs, in accordance with the funding model described in section 26-1-121.5, and shall certify by voucher to the controller the amounts to be paid to each county. The amounts so certified must be paid from the state treasury upon voucher of the state department and warrant of the controller and must be credited by the county treasurer to the county social services fund in accordance with the law and rules of the state department.

For purposes of operating the electronic benefits transfer service as authorized in section 26-2-104 once the service has been fully developed and implemented in any county, the state department shall determine the program costs and administrative costs related to assistance payments and food stamps for each county. Upon implementation of the electronic benefits transfer service in any county, the county share of the program and administrative costs shall either be billed to the county or deducted from appropriate advances to the county or from the county block grant allocation for implementation of the Colorado works program pursuant to part 7 of article 2 of this title. The cost of administering the electronic benefits transfer service shall not exceed the proportional cost per client that would have been paid by counties to issue benefits through the nonelectronic benefits system for the same fiscal year. Any savings that result from the use of the electronic benefits transfer service shall be shared among the state and local governments in proportion to such entities' contribution to the electronic benefits transfer service.

County departments shall keep such records and accounts in relation to the costs of administering assistance payments, the costs of administering food stamps, and the costs of administering social services as the state department shall prescribe by rules. Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section, all administrative costs shall be allocated, under rules of the state department, to either the performance of assistance payments functions, the performance of food stamp functions, or the performance of social services functions.

Except as provided in subsection (6) of this section and section 26-1-122.5, if the county departments are administered in accordance with the policies and rules of the state department for the administration of county departments, eighty percent of the costs of administering assistance payments, food stamps, and social services in the county departments shall be advanced to the county by the state treasurer from funds appropriated or made available for such purpose, upon authorization of the state department, but in no event shall the state department authorize expenditures greater than the annual appropriation by the general assembly for the state's share of such administrative costs of the county departments. As funds are advanced, adjustment shall be made from subsequent monthly payments for those purposes.

For purposes of this article, and except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, under rules of the state department, administrative costs shall include: Salaries of the county director and employees of the county department staff engaged in the performance of assistance payments, food stamps, and social services activities; the county's payments on behalf of such employees for old age and survivors' insurance or pursuant to a county officers' and employees' retirement plan and for any health insurance plan, if approved by the state department; the necessary travel expenses of the county board and the administrative staff of the county department in the performance of their duties; necessary telephone and telegraph; necessary equipment and supplies; necessary payments for postage and printing, including the printing and preparation of county warrants required for the administration of the county department; and such other administrative costs as may be approved by the state department; but advancements for office space, utilities, and fixtures may be made from state funds only if federal matching funds are available.

County departments shall keep such records and accounts in relation to assistance payments program costs and social services program costs as the state department shall prescribe by rules and as may be required in part 7 of article 2 of this title. All program costs shall be allocated, under rules of the state department, to either assistance payments or social services.

Except as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (4) and subsection (6) of this section, eighty percent of the amount expended for assistance payments program costs and social services program costs or the amount equal to the state's share of the amount expended as determined pursuant to section 26-1-122.5 shall be advanced to the county by the state treasurer from funds appropriated or made available for such purpose upon authorization of the state department pursuant to the provisions of this title. As funds are advanced, adjustment shall be made from subsequent monthly payments for those purposes.

For purposes of this article 1 and except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, under rules of the state department, program costs shall include: Amounts expended for assistance payments and social services (except for items enumerated in subsection (3)(c) of this section) under programs for aid to the needy disabled, aid to the blind, and child welfare services; expenses of treatment to prevent blindness or restore eyesight as defined in section 26-2-121; funeral and final disposition expenses as described in section 26-2-129; and state supplementation under part 2 of article 2 of this title 26.

Whenever any county, by reason of an emergency or other temporary condition, shall be unable to meet its necessary financial obligations for other public assistance purposes, and at the same time meet its requirements for assistance payments and social services under the program for aid to the needy disabled, the state department may in its discretion, upon consideration of the conditions and requirements of this title, reimburse such county in excess of eighty percent of the amount expended for assistance payments and social services under such program. The state department shall determine the amount of such excess reimbursement and the period of time during which such excess reimbursement shall be made. For such purpose, the state department may use not to exceed five percent of the total amount allocated to it by the state for administrative and program costs for assistance payments and social services under the program for which the excess reimbursement is provided.

When a county department provides or purchases certain specialized social services for public assistance applicants, recipients, or others to accomplish self-support, self-care, or better family life, including day care, homemaker services, foster care, and services to persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities, in accordance with applicable rules, the state may advance funds to the county department at a rate in excess of eighty percent within available appropriations, but not to exceed the amount expended by the county department for such services. The county department contribution for the period from January 1, 1981, through June 30, 1981, is ten percent, and beginning July 1, 1981, is five percent for the aid to the needy disabled home care program, the special needs of the disabled program, aid to the blind home care program, the special needs of the blind program, the adult foster care program, and other programs providing public assistance in the form of social services required by the federal "Social Security Act", as amended, for the purpose of establishing services that promote self-sufficiency for adult clients. As funds are advanced, adjustment shall be made from subsequent monthly payments for those purposes. The expenses of training personnel to provide these services as determined and approved by the state department shall be paid from whatever state and federal funds are available for such training purposes.

County departments shall provide or contract to provide a central information and referral service for all available services in the county which may prevent or reduce inappropriate institutional care through the use of community-based or home-based care.

The state department is authorized to provide not more than ten additional homemaker positions to be located in Adams, Larimer, Garfield, Otero, and Morgan counties. Reimbursement to each county for one hundred percent homemaker costs shall be based on a minimum case load of ten clients per reimbursed position which clients are currently in or would be admitted to skilled or intermediate care facilities or hospitals and who would not otherwise be served by current county staffing. Reports shall be provided monthly to the joint budget committee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the county department may spend in excess of twenty percent of actual costs for the purpose of matching federal funds for the administration of the child support enforcement program or for the administrative costs of activities involving food stamp, public assistance, or medical assistance fraud investigations or prosecutions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the county department may receive and spend federal funds to which it is entitled by reason of the county's expenditures in excess of the twenty percent required by subsection (1) of this section for any social services activity that has been approved by the department as an activity that is eligible for reimbursement under any federal program. Acceptance and expenditure of such federal funds shall in no way affect the state's share of and contribution to such payments, and the county shall be solely responsible for the provision of the nonfederal share that is in excess of the twenty percent.

Repealed.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the county department may receive and spend federal funds to which it is entitled based on the county's certification of public expenditures made by other entities within the county, which expenditures:

Are from sources other than the county social services fund;

Are in excess of the twenty percent required by subsection (1) of this section; and

Are for a social services activity that has been approved by the state department as an activity that is eligible for reimbursement under a federal program.

Acceptance and expenditure of federal funds pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (k) shall not affect the state's share of and contribution to the assistance payments program costs and social services program costs. The county shall be solely responsible for certifying the nonfederal share that is in excess of the county's twenty-percent share. The state department may retain up to five percent of any federal funds received by a county department pursuant to this paragraph (k). In addition, the state, in accordance with the provisions of section 26-1-109 (4)(d), shall recover any federal funds received by the county through the certification of public expenditures that are subsequently determined to be ineligible for federal reimbursement.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6) of this section, if in any fiscal year the annual appropriation by the general assembly for the state's share, together with any available federal funds for any income maintenance or social services program, or the administration of either, is not sufficient to advance to the counties the full applicable state share of costs, said program or the administration thereof shall be temporarily reduced by the state board so that all available state and federal funds shall continue to constitute eighty percent of the costs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the board of county commissioners in each county of this state shall annually appropriate as provided by law such funds as are necessary to defray the county's maintenance of effort requirement for the Colorado works program, created in part 7 of article 2 of this title 26, and the Colorado child care assistance program, created in part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5, including the costs allocated to the administration of each, and shall include in the tax levy for such county the sums appropriated for that purpose. The county's maintenance of effort requirement for the Colorado works program for state fiscal year 1997-98 and for state fiscal years thereafter is the targeted spending level identified in section 26-2-714 (6). Such appropriation must be based upon the county social services budget prepared by the county department pursuant to section 26-1-124, after taking into account state advancements provided for in this section.

Additional funds shall be made available by the board of county commissioners if the county funds so appropriated prove insufficient to defray the county department's maintenance of effort requirements for the Colorado works program and the Colorado child care assistance program, including the costs allocated to the administration of each.

The state department shall establish rules concerning what constitutes administrative costs and program costs for the Colorado works program. The executive director of the department of early childhood, in coordination with county departments, shall establish rules concerning what constitutes administrative costs and program costs for the Colorado child care assistance program. The state treasurer shall make advancements to county departments for the costs of administering the Colorado works program and the Colorado child care assistance program from funds appropriated or made available for such purpose, upon authorization of the department of early childhood or the state department, as applicable; except that in no event shall the department of early childhood or the state department authorize expenditures greater than the annual appropriation by the general assembly for such administrative costs of the county departments. As funds are advanced, adjustment shall be made from subsequent monthly payments for those purposes.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1173, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-21.

L. 75:

(4)(c) amended, p. 888, § 2, effective July 28.

L. 76:

(4)(f) and (4)(g) added, p. 667, § 1, effective May 10.

L. 77:

(1)(a), (1)(b), (2), (3)(b), (3)(c), (4)(b), (4)(e), and (5) amended and (1)(c), (1)(d), and (4)(h) added, p. 1322, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 79:

(1) to (3) amended, p. 1084, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 80:

(4)(e) amended, p. 642, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(4)(h) amended, p. 938, § 2, effective May 16.

L. 87:

(1)(d) amended and (4)(i) added, p. 1155, § 2, effective June 16.

L. 93:

(1)(a), (3)(b), and (4)(b) amended, p. 1116, § 26, effective July 1; (4)(e) amended, p. 1146, § 85, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(4)(i) amended, p. 636, § 1, effective April 14.

L. 95:

(2) amended, p. 592, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1222, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(6)(a) amended, p. 1197, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2000:

(6)(a) amended, p. 283, § 7, effective March 31.

L. 2008:

(4)(j) added, p. 1518, § 2, effective May 28.

L. 2009:

(4)(j) amended, (SB 09-267), ch. 206, p. 939, § 1, effective May 1.

L. 2011:

(4)(k) added, (HB 11-1196), ch. 160, p. 554, § 5, effective August 10.

L. 2017:

(4)(e) amended, (HB 17-1046), ch. 50, p. 159, § 14, effective March 16.

L. 2021:

(4)(c) amended, (SB 21-006), ch. 123, p. 497, § 26, effective September 7.

L. 2022:

(2)(a) amended, (SB 22-235), ch. 409, p. 2894, § 3, effective June 7; (6)(a) and (6)(c) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 853, § 87, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (4)(j)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (4)(j), effective January 1, 2010. (See L. 2009, p. 939.)

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act amending subsections (1)(a), (3)(b), and (4)(b), see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993; for the legislative declaration contained in the 1995 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 161, Session Laws of Colorado 1995.

(2) For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution.

26-1-122.3. Public assistance programs - county administration - data collection and analysis - vendor contract.

The state department shall contract with an external vendor to collect and analyze data relating to county department costs and performance associated with administering public assistance programs, including:

The supplemental nutrition assistance program, established in part 3 of article 2 of this title;

The medical assistance program, established in articles 4, 5, and 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.;

The children's basic health plan, established in article 8 of title 25.5, C.R.S.;

The Colorado works program, established in part 7 of article 2 of this title;

The program for aid to the needy disabled, pursuant to article 2 of this title;

The old age pension program, pursuant to part 1 of article 2 of this title; and

Long-term care services, pursuant to article 6 of title 25.5, C.R.S.

The contracted vendor's data collection and data analysis shall provide the general assembly, executive agencies, county departments, and public assistance program stakeholders with the following information that may be used to make targeted program improvements:

The status of each county department in meeting performance measures for administering public assistance programs;

An inventory of relevant county department activities, including, among others, application initiation, interactive interviews, and case reviews, and the purpose of the activities, which may include compliance with federal or state law;

An assessment of administrative work not yet completed by each county department and the cause of any delay in completing the work;

The amount of time spent by each county department on each activity;

The cost incurred by each county department, including staff and operating costs, relating to each activity and each client;

Any variances among county departments with respect to the cost incurred, time associated with each activity, and return on investment, and the source of those variances;

The relationship, if any, between the time and cost associated with each activity and the county department's performance with respect to the performance standards for the public assistance program;

The level of total county department funding needed to meet the county department's required workload relating to the administration of public assistance programs for which data is collected and analyzed pursuant to this section. This information must include the total county department funding needed for current business processes and the total county department funding needed if all county departments implement best practices and business reengineering concepts adopted by peer counties found to operate in the most cost-effective manner while meeting performance measures.

Business process improvements that contribute to a county department's decreased time or costs associated with each activity and to a county department's ability to meet or exceed the performance standards for the public assistance program, including improvements associated with previous state-funded business process reengineering initiatives; and

Options for a cost allocation model for the distribution of state funding to county departments for administering public assistance programs identified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1).

In order to ensure that the data collection and analysis contracted for pursuant to subsection (1) of this section yields information that is beneficial for its intended uses, prior to contracting with an external vendor for data collection and analysis, the state department shall contract with an external consultant to work with program administrators, fiscal agents, and program stakeholders to identify the scope of the data collection and analysis to be performed pursuant to this section.

In collaboration with the county departments, the state department shall design a continuous quality improvement program that, at a minimum, solicits feedback from the employees of the county departments to identify incremental and breakthrough continuous improvements that should be implemented to improve the products, services, and processes associated with the administration of public assistance programs. The state department shall provide a description of the program to the joint budget committee by February 1, 2017.

Source:

L. 2016:

Entire section added, (SB 16-190), ch. 201, p. 710, § 2, effective June 1.

26-1-122.5. County appropriation increases - limitations - definitions.

Beginning in calendar fiscal year 1994 and for each calendar fiscal year thereafter to and including calendar fiscal year 1997, the board of county commissioners in each county of this state shall annually appropriate funds for the county share of the administrative costs and program costs of public assistance and food stamps in the county in an amount equal to the actual county share for the previous fiscal year adjusted by an amount equal to the actual county share for the previous fiscal year multiplied by the percentage of change in property tax revenue.

For the purposes of this section:

"County share" means the actual amount of the county share for the previous fiscal year. "County share" shall not include:

The amount expended by the county from the county contingency fund or the county tax base relief fund pursuant to section 26-1-126;

The amount expended by the county for general assistance pursuant to part 1 of article 17 of title 30, C.R.S.; and

The amount expended by the county for programs or services provided by the county on its own, without requirements or funding from any other governmental agency.

"Percentage of change in property tax revenue" means the difference between the total property tax levied for the previous fiscal year less the amount levied for debt service for the previous fiscal year and the total property tax levied for the year for which the percentage of change in tax revenue is being calculated less the amount levied for debt service for the year in which the percentage of change in tax revenue is being calculated divided by the total property tax levied for the previous fiscal year less the amount levied for debt service for the previous fiscal year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 26-1-122, no county in the state shall be required to contribute more than the amount set forth in subsection (1) of this section in any fiscal year. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the ability of a county to establish programs or services provided by the county on its own, without requirements or funding from any other governmental agency.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2008, p. 1813, § 4, effective June 2, 2008.)

Any amounts remaining in the county social services fund created in section 26-1-123 at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the county fund for expenditure as determined by the board of county commissioners for administrative costs and program costs of public assistance, medical assistance, and food stamps.

The limitation set forth in this section on the increase in the county share of the administrative costs and program costs of public assistance and food stamps will result in increased costs to the state. By making state funds available, the state is encouraging counties not to exercise any right a county may have pursuant to section 20 (9) of article X of the Colorado constitution to reduce or end its share of the costs of public assistance and food stamps for the county for three fiscal years following the fiscal year in which the state funds are received. If a county accepts funds from the state based on the limitation provided in this section for any fiscal year, the county agrees not to exercise any rights the county may have to reduce or end its share of the costs of public assistance and food stamps for the fiscal year in which the funds are accepted. Nothing in this subsection (6) or any agreement pursuant to this subsection (6) shall be construed to affect the existence or status of any rights accruing to the state or any county pursuant to section 20 (9) of article X of the Colorado constitution.

In the event that there are any funds remaining in the department of human services budget which were appropriated for fiscal year 1994-95 to cover the additional state share of expenses required as a result of the limitation established in this section, the executive director of the department of human services shall distribute such remaining funds to counties whose assessed valuation declined between calendar year 1992 and 1993 if such county provides evidence to the department in 1994 that the county has a shortfall. Distributions to counties pursuant to this subsection (7) shall be made on a pro rata basis and shall not exceed the amount of the county's shortfall. For purposes of this section, "shortfall" means the amount by which a county's 1992 county share exceeds the property tax revenue collected by the county through its 1992 social services mill levy levied on the county's 1992 assessed valuation.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1117, § 27, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(7) added, p. 2612, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1) and (6) amended, p. 1992, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(2)(a)(I) and (4) amended, p. 1813, § 4, effective June 2.

Cross references:

(1) For the legislative declaration contained in the 1993 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 230, Session Laws of Colorado 1993. For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

(2) For the constitutional provision that establishes limitations on spending, the imposition of taxes, and the incurring of debt, see section 20 of article X of the Colorado constitution.

26-1-123. County social services fund.

A fund to be known as the "county social services fund" is hereby created and established in each of the counties of the state of Colorado, which fund shall consist of such accounts as may from time to time be established pursuant to rules of the state board.

The county social services fund consists of all money appropriated by the board of county commissioners for public assistance and welfare and related purposes; all money allotted, allocated, or apportioned to the county by the state department or the department of early childhood; such funds as are granted to the state of Colorado by the federal government for public assistance and welfare and related purposes and allocated to the county by the state department or the department of early childhood; and such other money as may be provided from time to time from other sources. The fund is available for the program and administrative costs of the county department.

The county board shall administer the fund pursuant to rules adopted by the state department and by the department of early childhood for purposes of child care assistance. The county treasurer is the treasurer and custodian of the fund and shall disburse money from the fund only upon special county social services warrants drawn by the person duly appointed by the county board. The county treasurer shall not collect any fee as provided in section 30-1-102 for the collection or deposit of any money in the county social services fund. Warrants must be signed by one member of the county board, who shall be designated by resolution for that purpose, and also signed by the person duly appointed by the county board. Such signatures indicate the approval of the board of county commissioners and the county board of social services. At such time as Title XVI of the federal "Social Security Act", as amended by Public Law 92-603, becomes effective, the state board by rule may make other provision for the issuance and signing of warrants under the old age pension, aid to the blind, and aid to the needy disabled.

All increased bonding fees necessitated by reason of the custody by the county treasurer of the county social services fund shall be a part of the administrative costs of the county department and shall be paid by the county board.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1176, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-22.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 1085, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(1) and (3)(a) amended, p. 1226, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(2) and (3)(a) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 854, § 88, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For amount and qualification of official bond of county treasurers in Colorado, see § 30-10-701; for form of bond, see § 30-10-703.

26-1-124. County social services budget.

As a part of the county budget and in conformity with the county budget law and the rules of the state board, a county social services budget shall be prepared by the county director and reviewed by the county board.

Before such budget is adopted by the board of county commissioners, it must be submitted by the county board to the state department for review. The state department shall review the budget in consultation with the department of early childhood and shall include in the review an assessment as to whether the county budget includes adequate funding for the county's maintenance of effort for the Colorado works program created in part 7 of article 2 of this title 26 and the Colorado child care assistance program created in part 1 of article 4 of title 26.5.

The state department shall prescribe budget forms and shall furnish a sufficient number of such forms to the county board without charge.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1176, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 1227, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (HB 22-1295), ch. 123, p. 854, § 89, effective July 1.

26-1-125. County social services levy - limitations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1176, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 119-1-24.

L. 77:

(1) R&RE, p. 1324, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

Entire section repealed, p. 1809, § 1, effective June 2.